Maryland, session 2025, HB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, from the
fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, school bus monitoring
cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), [and] (iv), AND (VII) of
this paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes,
including pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(ii) 1. For any fiscal year, if the balance remaining from the fines
collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring
systems, after the costs of implementing and administering the systems are recovered in
accordance with subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, is greater than 10% of the total
revenues of the political subdivision for the fiscal year, the political subdivision shall remit
any funds that exceed 10% of the total revenues to the Comptroller.
2. The Comptroller shall deposit any money remitted under
this subparagraph to the General Fund of the State.
(VII) 1. FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY HOWARD COUNTY
AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS PLACED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–809(B)(1)(VI)1, 2, AND 7 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE, ANY BALANCE REMAINING AFTER THE ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE USED FOR PUBLIC SAFETY

HOUSE BILL 1311 3
PURPOSES, INCLUDING PEDESTRIAN OR HIGHWAY SAFETY PROGRAMS, OR TO FUND
DEFERRED MAINTENANCE WORK AT HOWARD COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS.
2. ANY MONEY USED TO FUND DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE WORK UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL
BE USED TO SUPPLEMENT AND NOT SUPPLANT ANY FUNDS ALLOCATED IN THE
CAPITAL BUDGET OF HOWARD COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS.
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) A speed monitoring system may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. In Anne Arundel County, HOWARD COUNTY,
Montgomery County, or Prince George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as
defined in § 21–101 of this title, with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour,
which speed limit was established using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;

HOUSE BILL 1311
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line; [or]
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County;
OR
7. IN HOWARD COUNTY:
A. ON A HIGHWAY IDENTIFIED IN THE COUNTY’S OR
STATE’S MOST RECENT STRATEGIC HIGHWAY SAFETY PLAN OR VISION ZERO PLAN
AS A HIGHWAY THAT IS AT HIGH RISK FOR MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES, INCLUDING
THOSE INVOLVING PEDESTRIANS OR NONMOTORIZED VEHICLES, THAT RESULT IN
SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH; OR
B. ON U.S. ROUTE 1 (WASHINGTON BOULEVARD).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.